Maine, session 132, LD1200.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 22 MRSA §2383-D is enacted to read:
§2383-D. Unlawful sale or distribution of device containing nitrous oxide or intended
to be used to inhale nitrous oxide
1. Prohibited act. Except as provided in subsection 2, a person may not intentionally
or knowingly sell or distribute to another person a device that contains nitrous oxide or is
intended to be used to contain nitrous oxide for the purpose of causing intoxication,
euphoria, inebriation, excitement, stupefaction or the dulling of that person's brain or
nervous system through the inhalation of the nitrous oxide.
2. Exception. The prohibition under subsection 1 does not apply to the sale or
distribution of a device under subsection 1 to:
A. A dentist, dental hygienist or dental therapist who has obtained a sedation and
general anesthesia permit pursuant to Title 32, section 18379;
B. A pharmacist or pharmacy intern who dispenses the device in accordance with the
applicable scope of practice; or
C. A physician or physician assistant who is licensed by the Board of Licensure in
Medicine or Board of Osteopathic Licensure and who dispenses the device in
accordance with the applicable scope of practice.
3. Penalties. A person who violates this section commits a civil violation for which a
fine must be adjudged as follows:
A. Not less than $250 nor more than $500 for the first offense;
B. Not less than $400 nor more than $700 for the 2nd offense; and
C. One thousand dollars for the 3rd and each subsequent offense.